District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.22

Suspect settlement service providers.

The Mayor may create and maintain a public list of lenders and other settlement service providers, including real estate agents and appraisers, who have been found by a court to have engaged in a systematic pattern or practice of fraud or in operations in violation of the requirements of District law.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 222, 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 222 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).